Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXXIII Administration of Trusts and Estates of Persons Under Disability
CHAPTER 387 Guardians, Limited Guardians, and Conservators
387.300.
Qualifications of persons suing as next friend — Liability for costs.

No person shall sue as next friend unless he reside in this state and be free from disability, nor unless he file his own affidavit showing his right to sue as next friend according to the provisions of this chapter.

A guardian, curator, conservator or next friend who brings or prosecutes an action for a person who is under disability is liable for the costs which accrue during his conduct of the action, unless he be allowed to sue in forma pauperis or by an order of the court.

History.

C.C. 37: trans. Acts 1952, ch. 84, § 1, effective July 1, 1953; 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 14, § 344, effective January 2, 1978; 1982, ch. 141, § 141, effective July 1, 1982.

387.305.
Appointment of guardian ad litem — Qualifications — Duties — Fees.

No appointment of a guardian ad litem shall be made until the defendant is summoned, or until a person is summoned for him, as is authorized by law; nor until an affidavit of the plaintiff, or of his attorney, be filed in court, or with the clerk, showing that the defendant has no guardian, curator, nor conservator, residing in this state, known to the affiant.

A guardian ad litem must be a regular, practicing attorney of the court and may be appointed by the court, whether a guardian, curator, or conservator appear for the defendant or not. The guardian ad litem may be appointed upon the motion of the plaintiff or of any friend of the defendant; but neither the plaintiff nor his attorney shall be appointed, nor be permitted to suggest the name of the proposed guardian ad litem; and the court may change the guardian so appointed whenever the interest of the infant may appear to require such change.

It shall be the duty of the guardian ad litem to attend properly to the preparation of the case; and in an ordinary action he may cause as many witnesses to be subpoenaed as he may think proper, subject to the control of the court; and in an equitable action he may take depositions, not, however, exceeding three (3), without leave of the court.

The court shall allow to the guardian ad litem a reasonable fee for his services, to be paid by the plaintiff and taxed in the costs. The affidavit of such guardian, or of another person, or other competent evidence, is admissible to prove the services rendered, but not to prove their value. The court must decide concerning such value, without reference to the opinions of parties or other witnesses.

Whether appointed pursuant to this statute or pursuant to a provision of the Kentucky Unified Juvenile Code, the duties of a guardian ad litem shall be to advocate for the client’s best interest in the proceeding through which the guardian ad litem was appointed. Without an appointment, the guardian ad litem shall have no obligation to initiate action or to defend the client in other proceedings.

History.

C.C. 38: trans. Acts 1952, ch. 84, § 1; 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 14, § 345, effective January 2, 1978; 1982, ch. 141, § 142, effective July 1, 1982; 1996, ch. 294, § 1, effective July 15, 1996.

387.320.
Curator for property of aged or infirm person, appointed when — Bond.

Whenever any person deems himself unfit by reason of advanced age or physical disability and weakness to properly and prudently manage or care for his real or personal property or manage his business with prudence and understanding, the District Court may, upon his verified petition without notice or public hearing, appoint a curator to assume charge and management of his real or personal property or business, subject to the direction of the court.

The court shall take bond with good surety from the person appointed curator for the full and faithful performance of the trust confided in him.

History.

Enact. Acts 1966, ch. 253, §§ 1, 2; 1968, ch. 200, § 5; 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 14, § 346, effective January 2, 1978.

Research References and Practice Aids

Treatises

Caldwell’s Kentucky Form Book, 5th Ed., Settlement Ledger (AOC 846), Form 15.04.

Caldwell’s Kentucky Form Book, 5th Ed., Procedural Context for Curators, § 15.00.

387.330.
Petition for appointment of guardian or conservator conditioned on a contingency.

Any person of full age and sound mind may execute a verified petition for the voluntary appointment of a guardian or a conservator of that person’s property upon the express condition that the petition shall be acted upon by the court only upon the occurrence of an event specified or the existence of a described condition of the mental or physical health of the petitioner, the occurrence of which event, or the existence of which condition, shall be established in the manner directed in the petition. The petition, when filed, shall be accompanied by an affidavit from a licensed physician indicating that the person who signed the petition is now disabled as defined in KRS

387.510

. The petition shall advise the proposed ward of a guardian’s powers as provided in KRS

387.065

and conservator’s powers as provided in KRS

387.137

.

The petition may nominate a person for appointment to serve as guardian or conservator, and may request that the appointment be made without bond, or with bond of a certain stated sum. The court in appointing the guardian or conservator shall appoint the individual nominated unless the court finds that person unfit or incompetent and shall give due regard to the other requests and recommendations contained in the petition.

The petition may be deposited with the circuit clerk of the county in which the party resides, or with any person, firm, bank, or trust company selected by the petitioner.

The petition may be revoked by the petitioner at any time before appointment of a guardian or conservator by the court, if the petitioner is of sound mind. Revocation shall be accomplished by the destruction of the petition by the petitioner, or by the execution of an acknowledged instrument of revocation. If the petition has been deposited with the clerk, the revocation may be deposited there.

At any time after the deposit of the petition with the clerk, and before its revocation, it may be brought on for hearing by the filing of a verified statement to the effect that the occurrence of the event or the condition provided for in the petition has come to pass. If the petition has not been deposited with the clerk under the provisions of subsection (3) of this section, it may be brought on for hearing at any time by the filing of it and the verified statement with the circuit clerk of the county in which the person who executed the petition then resides.

At the time the petition is filed, the court, without any notice, may appoint the guardian or conservator nominated in the petition or may set the petition for hearing on notice the court may prescribe.

The powers and duties of a guardian or conservator shall be the same as those of a guardian or conservator appointed in response to any of the other petitions authorized in this chapter.

History.

Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 61, § 1, effective July 15, 1994.

Research References and Practice Aids

Kentucky Bench & Bar.

Wiederstein, Guardianship for Disabled Persons: A Practical Guide, Vol. 70, No. 1, January 2006, Ky. Bench & Bar 18.

Northern Kentucky Law Review.

Muehlenkamp, Kentucky Estate Planning and Administration Update, 22 N. Ky. L. Rev. 489 (1995).